Maryland, session 2026, HB0511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
6–901.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0511*

HOUSE BILL 511
In this subtitle, “catalytic revitalization project” means the substantial rehabilitation
of a HISTORIC property in the State:
(1) that:
(I) was formerly owned by the State or the federal government; OR
(II) IS A SUBSTANTIALLY VACANT OR FUNCTIONALLY
OBSOLESCENT PRIVATELY OWNED COMMERCIAL PROPERTY;
(2) the rehabilitation of which will foster economic, housing, and
community development within:
(I) the community in which the property is located;
(II) AN ARTS AND ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICT DESIGNATED
UNDER TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE;
(III) A MAIN STREET MARYLAND COMMUNITY DESIGNATED BY
THE DEPARTMENT; OR
(IV) A PRIORITY FUNDING AREA DESIGNATED UNDER TITLE 5,
SUBTITLE 7B OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; and
(3) that is out of service and [was formerly used as a college or university,
K–12 school, hospital, mental health facility, or military facility or installation] HAS AT
LEAST 250,000 SQUARE FEET OF EXISTING IMPROVEMENTS AND A MINIMUM
INTENDED INVESTMENT OF $50,000,000.
6–902.
(a) An individual, a nonprofit organization, or a business entity may claim a tax
credit in an amount equal to:
(1) for a project issued a single tax credit certificate on completion, [20%]
25% of the amount stated in the final tax credit certificate issued by the Secretary under §
6–903 of this subtitle for [5] 4 consecutive taxable years beginning with the taxable year
in which a final tax credit certificate is issued; or
(2) for a phased project issued a tax credit certificate on completion of a
phase, 100% of the amount stated in the final tax credit certificate issued by the Secretary
under § 6–903 of this subtitle for the taxable year in which the final tax credit certificate is
issued.

HOUSE BILL 511 3
(c) The Secretary may issue multiple final tax credit certificates for a project that
is issued an initial tax certificate under this section if:
(1) the project has been determined by the Secretary to be in phases;
(2) a phase of the project has been completed;
(3) a final tax credit certificate is not issued for more than [20%] 25% of
the project’s eligible expenses to date; and
(4) a final tax credit certificate is not issued that would exceed the
aggregated limit of a project’s credit under § 6–903(b) of this subtitle.
6–903.
(a) (1) Subject to the limitations of paragraph (2) of this subsection and
subsection (b) of this section, on application by an individual, a nonprofit organization, or
a business entity, the Secretary shall issue:
(i) an initial tax credit certificate in an amount equal to [20%] 25%
of the individual’s, nonprofit organization’s, or business entity’s estimated new construction
costs and rehabilitation costs for the project; and
(ii) on completion of the catalytic revitalization project or a phase of
the catalytic revitalization project, a final tax credit certificate in an amount equal to [20%]
25% of the individual’s, nonprofit organization’s, or business entity’s actual new
construction costs and rehabilitation costs for the project.
(2) For purposes of calculating the credit authorized under paragraph (1)
of this subsection, new construction costs:
(i) must be related to the construction of new structures that
connect, expand, or integrate the existing structures to be rehabilitated; and
(ii) may not exceed 50% of the total costs of the catalytic
revitalization project.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph [(2)(ii)] (3)(II) of this subsection, the
Secretary may not:
(i) accept applications and award initial credit certificates for
catalytic revitalization projects more than once within a [2–year] 1–YEAR period; or
(ii) issue tax credit certificates for credit amounts in the aggregate
totaling more than [$15,000,000] $35,000,000 within a [2–year] 1–YEAR period.

HOUSE BILL 511
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADJUST THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT FOR
TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES IN THE AGGREGATE SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF
THIS SUBSECTION EVERY YEAR, BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, TO REFLECT ANY
AGGREGATE INCREASE IN THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN
CONSUMERS (CPI–U) FOR THE WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA, OR ANY
SUCCESSOR INDEX, FOR THE PREVIOUS YEAR.
[(2)] (3) (i) The Secretary may revoke an initial credit certificate on a
finding by the Secretary that the recipient is not in compliance with the initial credit
certificate or an agreement with the Department regarding the initial credit certificate.
(ii) If the Secretary revokes an initial credit certificate under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Secretary may award an initial credit certificate to
another applicant, provided that the award does not exceed the amount of the revoked
initial credit certificate.
(f) (1) The amount of the tax credit stated in the final tax credit certificate
that is allowed, but not claimed, under this subtitle may be transferred, by written
instrument, in whole or in part, to any individual, nonprofit organization, or business
entity, INCLUDING A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION FOR PROJECT FINANCING PURPOSES.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER,
PUBLISH ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE THE AVAILABLE CREDIT AMOUNT AND
DETAILS ON THE PROCESS TO APPLY FOR THE ISSUANCE OF TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) ISSUE GUIDANCE ON A TIMELINE FOR THE ISSUANCE OF INITIAL
AND FINAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES FOR APPLICANTS WHO WISH TO UTILIZE
CREDIT CERTIFICATES TO SECURE PROJECT FINANCING.
6–904.
The Secretary, in consultation with the Department of Commerce, shall adopt
regulations to carry out the provisions of this subtitle, including regulations that:
(1) establish procedures and standards for certifying new construction
costs and rehabilitation costs under this subtitle, INCLUDING COST–CERTIFICATION
REQUIREMENTS FOR ANY NEW CONSTRUCTION OR SITE IMPROVEMENT COSTS THAT
ARE INTEGRAL TO THE REHABILITATION;
(2) establish an application process for the issuance of tax credit
certificates under this subtitle, with an emphasis on applications that:

HOUSE BILL 511 5
(I) promote affordable housing, ECONOMIC GROWTH, OR JOB
CREATION; AND
(II) HAVE A CATALYTIC IMPACT ON ADVANCING THE
PLACE–BASED ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT GOALS OF A
DESIGNATED MAIN STREET MARYLAND COMMUNITY OR ARTS AND
ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICT; and
(3) establish procedures for the approval of project phases for tax credit
certificates issued under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all initial credit certificates issued for the catalytic
revitalization project tax credit on or after July 1, 2026.